Arkansas, session 2025, SB69.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-15-403, concerning the recordation or
filing of an instrument that affects the title to real estate or personal
property, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(f) A deed or other instrument purporting to convey real property or
an interest in real property without warranty shall be received for record or
filing only by the recorder of the county in which the real property is
located.
*TNL040*
01/14/2025 2:39:21 PM TNL040

SB69

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 14-15-412, concerning the certification of
an instrument that affects the title to real estate, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(c)(1) Each county recorder shall create a form that a real property
owner may complete that prohibits the purported conveyance without warranty
of the owner's real property or interest in real property by a deed or
instrument unless the:
(A) Deed or instrument is signed in person at the office
of the recorder of the county in which the real property is located;
(B) County recorder has obtained receipt of the lawful
signature of the real property owner at the office of the recorder of the
county in which the real property is located; and
(C) Real property owner shows the recorder of the county
in which the real property is located his or her government-issued photo
identification, including without limitation a passport or state-issued
driver's license.
(2) If a real property owner is unable to sign a form in person
as required by subdivision (c)(1)(A) of this section, the form signed by the
real property owner may be submitted in person by an individual acting under
a properly executed power of attorney for the real property owner.
(3) A form completed and signed under this subsection shall
remain in effect until the real property owner:
(A) Conveys the real property or his or her interest in
the real property; or
(B) Rescinds the form.
(4) The protections of real property or an interest in real
property guaranteed by the completion of a form under this subsection are not
transferable.
(5)(A) A county recorder's office may charge a one-time fee for
the completion of a form under subdivision (c)(1) of this section.
(B)(i) Except as provided under subdivisions (c)(5)(B)(ii)
and (c)(5)(B)(iii) of this section, a one-time fee charged under this
subdivision (c)(5) shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100).
(ii) For an individual who is over sixty-five (65)
years of age or permanently disabled, a one-time fee charged under this
01/14/2025 2:39:21 PM TNL040

SB69
subdivision (c)(5) shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50).
(iii) For real property that is occupied by an
individual other than the real property owner, a one-time fee charged under
this subdivision (c)(5) shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250).
(6) A deed or other instrument purporting to convey real
property or an interest in real property of an owner who completed a form
under subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall not be submitted for
recordation or filing by a county recorder unless all requirements under this
subsection are met.



























01/14/2025 2:39:21 PM TNL040